District of Columbia statutes.
42-2003

Establishment by subdivision.

Whenever the owners or the co-owners of any square or lot shall subdivide the same into a condominium project in conformity with § 42-2009 with a plat of condominium subdivision there shall be established a horizontal property regime.

History

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 451, Pub. L. 88-218, § 3

Cross References

Real property assessment and tax, condominium defined, see §§ 47-803, 47-1002.
Real property assessment and tax, horizontal property regime defined, see § 47-803.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-803, § 47-813, and § 47-1002.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1703.
1973 Ed., § 5-903.

Editor's Notes

Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.